Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 2

Women's Penitentiary

41-1-201. Female unit established.

The female unit of the state penitentiary shall be a separate institution apart from the administration of the main prison and shall remain a separate unit of the department of correction, but governed by the laws, not in conflict with this chapter, as were in force on July 1, 1965, governing the state penitentiary at Nashville, Brushy Mountain Penitentiary, Fort Pillow State Farm, and other penal institutions, reformatories, branches or facilities of the department.

Acts 1965, ch. 178, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1701.

Cross-References. Wardens and superintendents, §§ 4-6-103 – 4-6-108.

41-1-202. Appointment and qualifications of warden.

The warden of the female penitentiary of this state shall be subject to appointment or discharge by the commissioner of correction, upon approval of the governor.

The warden:

Shall, at the time of appointment, be not less than twenty-five (25) years of age;

Shall be qualified to be proficient in the management of a state penal institution;

Will hold a masters degree from a duly accredited approved university in business administration, education or penology and correction; or

Have other qualifications that, in the opinion of the commissioner, would be equal to or greater than the qualifications listed in subdivisions (b)(1)-(3).

Acts 1965, ch. 178, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 41-1702; Acts 1990, ch. 942, § 1.

Cross-References. Wardens and superintendents, §§ 4-6-103 – 4-6-108.

41-1-203. Authority and powers.

The warden of the female institution mentioned in § 41-1-201 shall be endowed with the same authority, powers and provisions of the law as are now enjoyed by the warden of the state penitentiary.

Acts 1965, ch. 178, § 3; 1972, ch. 576, § 24; T.C.A., § 41-1703.

Cross-References. Wardens and superintendents, §§ 4-6-103 – 4-6-108.